Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 3
ACCESS TO ADOPTION INFORMATION

19-5-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that adult adoptees, adoptive parents, biological parents, and biological siblings should have a right of access to certain records regarding their or their child's adoption or the adoption of their offspring
or siblings as outlined in section 19-5-305 and that such a right must coexist with the right of such parties to privacy and confidentiality. The general assembly also finds that an adult adoptee, his biological or adoptive parent,
or his biological sibling may desire to obtain information about each other at different points in time. Furthermore, the general assembly finds that confidentiality from the general public is essential to the adoption process
and that any procedure to access information which relates to an adoption to search for unknown relatives through a confidential intermediary or a licensed child placement agency must be designed to maintain confidentiality and
to respect the wishes of all involved parties.

It is the purpose of this part 3 to establish a confidential process whereby adult adoptees and adoptive parents who desire information concerning their or their child's adoption and biological parents and siblings who desire information concerning an
adult adoptee may pursue access to such information.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the purpose of establishing the confidential process set forth in this part 3 is to create a pool of individuals who the courts and interested parties may call upon to initiate a search for a biological
relative. It is not the intent of the general assembly that such process shall be construed as the regulation of an occupation or profession.

Source:

L. 89:
Entire part added, p. 940, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 2014:
(1) amended, (SB 14-051), ch. 260, p. 1048, § 4, effective July 1.

19-5-302. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:
Entire part added, p. 941, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 85, § 11, effective March 20.

Cross references:
For current applicable definitions, see § 19-1-103.

19-5-303. Commission created - duties.

There is created in the department the adoption intermediary commission, referred to in this section as the "commission", which consists of thirteen members. The commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and
performs the duties and functions specified by this part 3 under the department:

Three members shall represent the judicial department and shall be appointed by the chief justice or his or her designee;

Two members shall represent the department and shall be appointed by the executive director of such department or his or her designee;

Three members shall represent licensed adoption agencies and shall be appointed by a representative of a private adoption agency. Such representative shall be selected by the executive director of the department.

Three members shall represent either adoptees, adoptive parents, biological parents of adoptees, or biological siblings of adoptees and shall be selected by the executive director of the department;

Two members shall represent confidential intermediaries and shall have completed training as confidential intermediaries. Such members shall be appointed by the executive director of the department.

The commission shall have responsibility for:

Drafting a manual of standards for training confidential intermediaries and licensed child placement agencies that perform searches and contact persons pursuant to section 19-5-305 (3)(b)(III);

Monitoring confidential intermediary training programs and child placement agencies with search and consent programs to ensure compliance with the standards set forth in the manual, with authority to approve or deny such programs based upon compliance
with such standards;

Maintaining an up-to-date list of persons who have completed training as confidential intermediaries or as persons who conduct searches for child placement agencies and communicating such list to the judicial department.

The commission shall adopt its own rules of procedure, shall select a chairman, a vice-chairman, and such other officers as it deems necessary, and shall keep a record of its proceedings. The commission shall meet as often as necessary to carry out its
duties, but in no instance shall it meet less than annually. The commission may seek input from confidential intermediary organizations in carrying out its duties.

The commission shall be voluntary and shall not receive per diem payments.

Source:

L. 89:
Entire part added, p. 941, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 91:
IP(1) amended, p. 890, § 14, effective June 5.

L. 93:
(4) amended, p. 657, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:
IP(1) and (1)(b) to (1)(d) amended, p. 2689, § 213, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(1) amended, p. 1166, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 1373, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(2)(c) amended, p. 767, § 31, effective June 1; (2)(c) amended, p. 993, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2022:
IP(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3376, § 67, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
The introductory portion to subsection (1) was amended by SB 22-162, but the introductory phrase, "Representation and appointment of such members shall be as follows:", at the end of the provision was inadvertently deleted
during the drafting of the bill. The introductory portion to subsection (1) is shown to reflect how the provision appeared in SB 22-162 when acted on by the Governor.

Cross references:
For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-5-304. Confidential intermediaries - confidential intermediary services.

Any person who has completed a confidential intermediary training program that meets the standards set forth by the commission shall be responsible for notifying the commission that his or her name should be included on the list of confidential intermediaries
to be maintained by the commission and made available to the judicial department. The commission shall adopt rules to determine when and under what conditions the name of a confidential intermediary shall be removed from
the list available to the judicial department.

Once a person is included on the list of confidential intermediaries, he or she shall be:

Authorized to inspect confidential relinquishment and adoption records, post-adoption records, and dependency and neglect records, including but not limited to court files, within forty-five days after a motion to the court is filed by the following persons:

An adult adoptee;

An adoptive parent, custodial grandparent, or legal guardian of a minor adoptee;

A biological parent or an adult biological sibling or half-sibling of an adult adoptee;

An adult descendant of the adoptee or the adoptive parent, spouse of an adoptee, adult stepchild, or adopted adult sibling of an adoptee with the notarized written consent of the adult adoptee;

A biological grandparent of an adoptee with the notarized written consent of the biological parent. No written consent is required if the biological parent is deceased.

The legal representative of any of the individuals listed in sub-subparagraphs (A) to (E) of this subparagraph (I);

A former foster child who may or may not have been adopted, who is eighteen years of age or older, and who is searching for a birth sibling who is also eighteen years of age or older, who may or may not have been adopted, and who may or may not have been
in the foster care system;

Available, subject to time constraints, for appointment by the court to act as a confidential intermediary for any of the parties listed in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b).

Any of the parties listed in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, any of whom are eighteen years of age or older, may file a motion, with supporting affidavit, in the court where the adoption took place, to appoint one
or more confidential intermediaries for the purpose of determining the whereabouts of such individual's unknown relative or relatives; except that no one shall seek to determine the whereabouts of a relative who is younger
than eighteen years of age. The court may rule on said motion and affidavit without hearing and may appoint a trained confidential intermediary.

The court-appointed confidential intermediary shall make a diligent search of the adoption records and post-adoption records in an effort to find the sought-after relative. If the confidential intermediary successfully locates the relative sought, the
confidential intermediary shall provide that relative with the opportunity to:

Consent to or to refuse to allow contact by the person seeking contact;

Fill out a contact preference form and updated medical history statement as prescribed in section 19-5-305 (1.5);

Repealed.

(2.5) For purposes of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, "legal guardian" shall not include a governmental entity of any foreign country from which a child has been adopted or any representative of such governmental entity.

Any information obtained by the confidential intermediary during the course of his or her investigation shall be kept strictly confidential and shall be utilized only for the purpose of arranging a contact between the individual who initiated the search
and the sought-after biological relative or for the purpose of obtaining consent for the release of adoption records.

When a sought-after biological relative is located by a confidential intermediary on behalf of the individual who initiated the search, the confidential intermediary shall obtain consent from both parties that they wish to personally communicate with
one another.

Contact shall be made between the parties involved in the investigation only when consent for such contact has been received by the court.

If consent for personal communication is not obtained from both parties, all relinquishment and adoption records and any information obtained by any confidential intermediary during the course of his or her investigation shall be returned to the court
and shall remain confidential.

All confidential intermediaries shall inform both the requesting biological relative and the sought-after biological relative of the existence of the voluntary adoption registry set forth in section 25-2-113.5, C.R.S.

Any person acting as a confidential intermediary who knowingly fails to comply with the provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 89:
Entire part added, p. 942, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 97:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 1166, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(1)(b), (2), (3), and (4)(c) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1131, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 1368, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(2) amended, p. 984, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:
IP(1)(b) and IP(1)(b)(I) amended and (1)(b)(I)(G) added, (SB 09-079), ch. 59, p. 214, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2014:
(2)(b)(III) repealed, (SB 14-051), ch. 260, p. 1049, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2021:
(6) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3221, § 392, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:
(2.5) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2973, § 43, effective August 10.

19-5-305. Access to adoption records - contact with parties to adoption - contact preference form and updated medical history statement - definitions.

Confidentiality. All adoption records are confidential from the general public and must remain confidential except as described in subsections (1.5) and (2) of this section or upon demonstration of good cause pursuant to section 19-1-309 or as otherwise
provided by law.

(1.5) Contact preference forms and updated medical history statements from birth parents.

The state registrar shall prescribe and make available to a birth parent named on an original birth certificate in the records of the state registrar a contact preference form on which the birth parent may indicate a preference regarding contact by the
adult adoptee, an adult descendant of the adoptee, or a legal representative of the adoptee or descendant. The purpose of the contact preference form is to allow the birth parent the opportunity to indicate a preference
to be contacted directly, to be contacted through a third party, or not to be contacted by other parties.

The form must also include space for a written statement by the birth parent, which may include updated medical history about the birth parent or other biological relatives, an explanation for the stated contact preference, or other information for the
party seeking records. The medical history statement form must indicate that the birth parent is waiving confidentiality of any medical information supplied in the statement with respect to the adoptee, an adult descendant
of the adoptee, or a legal representative of such individual, and to the state registrar or his or her designees.

The state registrar shall maintain the contact preference form and the medical history statements, if any, and make them accessible to an individual who is an eligible party allowed to receive adoption records as described in subparagraph (I) of paragraph
(b) of subsection (2) of this section and who submits a written application form, proof of identity, and an explanation of the individual's relationship to the adoptee, if applicable. The state registrar is authorized to
verify the submission of a contact preference form or an updated medical history statement and to provide a copy of a contact preference form to a confidential intermediary appointed pursuant to section 19-5-304 or to a
designated employee of a child placement agency who is searching pursuant to subparagraph (III) of paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section. The state registrar shall maintain and make available to the public accurate
statistics about the number of contact preference forms on file with the state registrar and how many of the forms state a preference for contact, no contact, or contact through a third party.

As used in this section, "eligible party" means a person who is eligible under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section to have access to adoption records.

The option on the contact preference form that allows a birth parent to authorize or not authorize the release of the original birth certificate to eligible parties expires on January 1, 2016. The state registrar shall revise the contact preference form
to eliminate this option, effective January 1, 2016, and shall neither distribute nor accept contact preference forms on or after January 1, 2016, that contain an option regarding such release. On and after January
1, 2016, contact preference forms shall only address a birth parent's preferences regarding contact and the ability to submit an explanation for the stated contact preference and to submit or update medical history.
A child placement agency is not liable to any person for the failure of a birth parent to submit a contact preference form to the state registrar. On and after July 1, 2014, the state registrar shall post a notice
on the website of the office of the state registrar of vital statistics stating that the contact preference form will be revised to eliminate the option to authorize or object to the release of the original birth
certificate and that birth parents may exercise this option prior to January 1, 2016.

Prior to allowing access to and providing a copy of an original birth certificate to an eligible party, the state registrar must perform a diligent search for a contact preference form executed prior to January 1, 2016, to ascertain if either birth parent
had stated a preference authorizing or not authorizing the release of the original birth certificate to eligible parties. If both birth parents have filed a contact preference form executed prior to January 1, 2016,
stating a preference to authorize the release of the original birth certificate, then the state registrar must release the original birth certificate to the eligible party. If there is no contact preference form
on file prior to January 1, 2016, from a birth parent named on the original birth certificate, or if a contact preference form executed prior to January 1, 2016, is on file that states a preference that the original
birth certificate not be released, then the state registrar may not release the original birth certificate to the eligible party prior to January 1, 2016, unless the birth parent rescinds the contact preference
form, upon mutual consent of two or more reunited parties, the birth parent is deceased, or the eligible party obtains a court order pursuant to section 19-1-309. When one birth parent has authorized the release
of the birth certificate and the other birth parent has filed a contact preference form prior to January 1, 2016, not authorizing release, the state registrar shall issue the original birth certificate to the eligible
party with the name of the nonconsenting parent redacted.

Legislative declaration - access to adoption records.

The general assembly takes note that the law in Colorado regarding access to adoption records has treated persons differently depending upon the law in effect upon the date of the adoption of the adoptee and that the statutory scheme has been confusing,
complicated, and ambiguous. By repealing and reenacting provisions of this section to remove those varying time periods and varying levels of access or nonaccess to adoption records by an adult adoptee or by a birth parent,
it is the intent of the general assembly that access to adoption records no longer be dependent upon the law in effect on the date of the finalization of adoption. The general assembly declares that the purpose of the revision
of this subsection (2) is to make the access to adoption records by members of the adoption triad more uniform as outlined in this subsection (2). The general assembly further declares that it is the intent of the general
assembly to not abrogate, limit, or change the holding in or affect any rights created under In re J.N.H., 209 P.3d 1221 (Colo. App. 2009) with respect to access by an adult adoptee to the names of his or her birth parents
and to all court records and papers regarding the adoption of the adult adoptee. The general assembly further declares that in construing this section, the courts should liberally construe this section in favor of releasing
the records.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section and in addition to information exchanged in a designated adoption or inspection authorized by a court upon good cause shown pursuant to section 19-1-309, access to adoption records by certain parties is governed
by the following provisions:

Adult adoptees, their descendants, and adoptive family members. Upon request, the custodian of records shall provide direct access, without redaction, to all adoption records, as defined in section 19-1-103, for inspection and copying by an adult adoptee,
an adoptive parent of a minor adoptee, a custodial grandparent of a minor adoptee, or the legal representative of any such individual. In addition, the custodian of records shall provide direct access to
adoption records for inspection and copying by a spouse of an adult adoptee, an adult descendant of an adoptee, an adult sibling or half-sibling of an adult adoptee, an adoptive parent or grandparent of
an adult adoptee, or the legal representative of any such individual, if the individual requesting access has the notarized written consent of the adult adoptee or if the adult adoptee is deceased. (B) Access
by an adult adoptee or descendant to the original birth certificate and amended birth certificate of a sibling with a common birth parent. Upon proof of evidence of at least one common birth parent between
an adult adoptee and a sibling or half-sibling, the custodian of records shall provide, without redaction, to an adult adoptee, a descendant of the adult adoptee, or a legal representative of the adult adoptee
or descendant direct access to a noncertified copy of the unaltered original birth certificate and the amended birth certificate of an adult sibling or half-sibling who was born, relinquished, or adopted
in the state of Colorado, subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

Access by a birth parent to the original birth certificate. A birth parent who relinquished a child for adoption, whose termination of the parent-child legal relationship was not the result of a dependency and neglect action, and who signed or is named
on the original birth certificate may apply to the state registrar for and obtain a noncertified copy of the unaltered original birth certificate of the child he or she relinquished if the child was born in this
state, or if the child's adoption was finalized in this state, or both.

Access to death certificates of deceased parties. Upon request of an eligible party or a birth parent as described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), the state registrar shall conduct a search of death certificates to determine whether an adoptee
or a birth parent is deceased. If the state registrar finds a death certificate for the adult adoptee or the birth parent, then the state registrar shall provide a copy to the eligible party. The state registrar
may collect a fee for conducting a search and for making a copy of the death certificate.

Access to records pertaining to a deceased party. If an eligible party or a birth parent as described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) applies to a custodian of records for access to records about an adult adoptee or a birth parent and the custodian
of records determines that the person whose records are being sought is deceased or can reasonably be presumed to be deceased based on the known or estimated date of birth of the sought party, the custodian
of records shall provide direct access to the records for inspection and copying by the eligible party.

Proof of identification and fees. Prior to releasing any records to any eligible party allowed to receive records pursuant to this subsection (2), the custodian of records must require the eligible party requesting access to provide proof of identification.
The custodian of records may charge reasonable fees for providing copies of records. The state registrar shall transmit all moneys collected pursuant to subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (b) and this subparagraph
(IV) to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the vital statistics records cash fund created in section 25-2-121, C.R.S.

Release of records by child placement agencies and prior written statements of birth parents. Notwithstanding subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section, the adoption records, as defined in section 19-1-103, in the possession of a child placement agency are
not open for inspection or available for copying with respect to any identifying information concerning a birth parent if the birth parent has previously provided the court and the child placement agency, if applicable,
with a signed and notarized written statement, within three years after the final order of relinquishment or termination of the parent-child legal relationship, specifying that such parent wishes the identifying
information concerning that parent to remain confidential; except that the adoption records in the possession of a child placement agency may be open for inspection and made available for copying with respect to
identifying information concerning a birth parent if a birth parent provides a consent form, as defined in section 19-1-103, to the child placement agency consenting to the release of identifying information and
the release of identifying information is consistent with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. A written statement specifying that a birth parent wishes the identifying information concerning that parent
on file with a child placement agency to remain confidential must remain in the court's and the child placement agency's relinquishment or termination file unless later withdrawn by the parent or superceded by a
consent form. A child placement agency is not liable to any individual for the failure of a birth parent to submit such a written statement to the court. In addition to such a statement, the birth parent may also
submit to the court and to the child placement agency a letter of explanation that the court and the child placement agency must release to the adoptee at the time that the adoptee makes a request for inspection
of the adoption records. This subsection (2)(b)(V) applies only to adoption records in the possession of child placement agencies and does not apply to adoption records in the possession of the court or any other
agency, entity, or person.

Access to identifying information through child placement agencies.

Upon proof of identity of the person submitting the consent form, a licensed child placement agency shall accept and may seek a consent form, as that term is defined in section 19-1-103, from an adult adoptee or from either adult adoptee's birth parent
or from an adoptive parent of a minor adoptee or from the legal representative of a minor adoptee authorizing the release of identifying information, as that term is defined in section 19-1-103, concerning the person submitting
the consent form, to the extent such information is available to the child placement agency. If only one birth parent has filed a consent form with the child placement agency, the child placement agency or any succeeding
custodian of the records shall provide a copy of the identifying information without the name of and without identifying information about the nonconsenting birth parent.

Upon inquiry by an adult adoptee or an adult adoptee's birth parent or an adoptive parent of a minor adoptee seeking information about another party from a licensed child placement agency, the child placement agency shall be authorized to release identifying
information to the inquiring person, upon proof of identity by the inquiring person, if the licensed child placement agency is in possession of a consent form from the party about whom information is sought authorizing
such release.

In those circumstances in which a child placement agency has released identifying information pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the child placement agency may attempt to locate at the last known address the person who had originally submitted
the consent form and, upon locating such person, advise him or her of the release and provide him or her with the opportunity to fill out a contact preference form and updated medical history statement as prescribed
in subsection (1.5) of this section. If the inquiring person also submitted a consent form authorizing the release of identifying information about him or her, the child placement agency may provide such identifying
information to the person located.

A child placement agency that accepts a consent form may perform a search for the sought party, subject to the requirement that an employee designated by the child placement agency to perform a search and to contact the sought party shall have completed
training that meets the standards set forth by the adoption intermediary commission.

A licensed child placement agency that accepts a consent form may charge a reasonable fee to cover the direct and indirect costs associated with the services provided pursuant to this subsection (3), if a written fee agreement has been signed by the agency
and the party submitting the consent form prior to the provision of any service. If a child placement agency charges a fee, then the child placement agency shall make reasonable efforts to locate the person being sought
and to release the information the child placement agency obtained to the person located. The licensed child placement agency shall be required to provide a list of names, addresses, and telephone numbers of organizations
performing similar services prior to signing any fee agreement with any party submitting a consent form. Information in the post-adoption record is confidential and shall not be disclosed by a licensed child placement agency
or any succeeding custodian of the records, or a court except as specifically permitted in this part 3, or as otherwise permitted by law.

The release of any information by a licensed child placement agency pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

Access to information and contact concerning sibling groups. Notwithstanding the provisions set forth in subsections (1.5), (2), and (3) of this section authorizing access to adoption records and contact with an adoptee, in those circumstances in which
one family has adopted two or more siblings, access to the adoption records concerning an adoptee and contact with an adoptee shall not occur until all of the siblings adopted by the family have attained eighteen years of age.

Adult adoptee's restriction on access to records. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, an adult adoptee may, at any time, provide the court that finalized the adoption and the child placement agency with a signed and notarized
written statement specifying that such adult adoptee wishes to maintain identifying information concerning that adoptee, other than the original birth certificate, confidential. The written statement shall remain in the court's
adoption file unless later withdrawn by the adoptee. Nothing in this subsection (5) shall be construed to affect access to records through the confidential intermediary process.

Contact between the parties. Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, any party may seek to make direct contact with another party or to use the services of a confidential intermediary as provided in section 19-5-304, a licensed child
placement agency as provided in subsection (3) of this section, or the voluntary adoption registry maintained by the state registrar as provided in section 25-2-113.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 99:
Entire section added, p. 1132, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(2)(a)(I)(A), (2)(a)(I)(B), (2)(b)(I)(A), (2)(b)(I)(B), (2)(b)(I)(C), (2)(b)(II), (2)(c), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1369, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
Entire section amended, p. 985, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2014:
(1), (1.5), and (2) R&RE and (6) added, (SB 14-051), ch. 260, p. 1043, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:
(2)(b)(I) amended, (HB 15-1106), ch. 59, p. 142, § 2, effective March 30; (2)(b)(I) amended, (HB 15-1355), ch. 311, p. 1273, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2021:
IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(I)(A), (2)(b)(V), and (3)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 736, § 90, effective October 1.

Cross references: (1) For the provisions referring to confidential intermediaries formerly found in subsection (2)(a)(II), see §

19-5-304 (2)(b)

. (See L. 2005, p. 984.)

(2) For the short title ("Heritage Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 15-1355, see section 1 of chapter 311, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

19-5-305.5. Access to personal records relating to a former ward of the state home for dependent and neglected children - other eligible parties - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Eligible party" means:

A former ward, regardless of adoption status;

A spouse of a former ward;

An adult descendant of a former ward;

An adult sibling or half-sibling of a former ward; or

The legal representative of any individual described in subparagraphs (I) to (IV) of this paragraph (a), if the individual requesting access has the notarized written consent of the former ward or if the former ward is deceased.

"Former ward" means a person who as a minor child was in the custody of the state home for dependent and neglected children, regardless of the person's adoption status.

"Personal records" means the following documents and information pertaining to the custody, relinquishment, or adoption of a former ward, without redaction:

The original birth certificate;

The amended birth certificate;

The temporary waiver of custody;

The final order of relinquishment;

The order of termination of parental rights;

The final decree of adoption;

The name of the former ward before placement in adoption; the name and address of each birth parent as they appear in the birth records or other documents, including other information that might personally identify a birth parent; and the name and address
of each adoptive parent; and

The physical description of the birth parents; the educational background of the birth parents; the occupation of the birth parents; genetic information about the birth family; medical information about the former ward's birth; social information about
the birth parents; whether the former ward has siblings or half-siblings, and, if so, the names and addresses of the siblings and half-siblings; and the placement history of the former ward.

"Personal records" does not include prerelinquishment counseling records, which records shall remain confidential.

Upon proof of identification and upon request, the custodian of records, as defined in section 19-1-103, shall provide direct access, without redaction, to all personal records for inspection and copying by an eligible party relating to a former ward
who, regardless of adoption status, as a minor was in the custody of the state home for dependent and neglected children.

Prior to releasing any personal records to an eligible party allowed to receive personal records pursuant to this section, the custodian of records must require the eligible party requesting access to provide proof of identification. The custodian of
records may charge reasonable fees for providing copies of records.

Source:

L. 2015:
Entire section added, (HB 15-1355), ch. 311, p. 1273, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2021:
(2) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 737, § 91, effective October 1.

Cross references:
For the short title ("Heritage Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 15-1355, see section 1 of chapter 311, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

19-5-306. Public information campaign.

The executive directors of the department of human services and the department of public health and environment, or such executive directors' designees, shall work together to design and implement efforts within existing appropriations to assist in informing
the public about the existence and availability of the confidential intermediary process established in this part 3 and the voluntary adoption registry established pursuant to section 25-2-113.5, C.R.S., to inform the public about
the change in the availability of adoption records, including birth certificates, and other records related to the adoption process as set forth in section 19-5-305, and to inform birth parents about the opportunity to complete contact
preference forms and submit updated medical history statements as set forth in section 19-5-305. Such efforts shall be implemented within existing appropriations on and after July 1, 2005, by disseminating information to the public
through child placement agencies and through the use of public service announcements and such other additional means of communication as the executive directors or their designees determine appropriate. The public information campaign
shall also provide referral information on community resources that may be available to the adoption triad to assist them in dealing with issues that arise in searches and reunifications with relatives or in deciding not to seek contact
or information about relatives. Such resources shall include a variety of sources, including child placement agencies, social workers, therapists and faith-based counselors, and organizations designed to provide support to members
of the adoption triad.

Source:

L. 99:
Entire section added, p. 1132, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
Entire section amended, p. 993, § 6, effective July 1.

19-5-307. Child placement agency - transfer of records.

If a child placement agency terminates its child placement activities, prior to termination of services, the child placement agency shall microfilm or preserve with state-of-the-art record storage methods as prescribed by the department of human services
any relevant files on adoptions and transfer them to the division in the department of human services responsible for child care licensing. The state board of human services shall promulgate rules to require child placement agencies
to scan adoption records for purposes of transferring them upon termination of child placement activities to the division in the department of human services responsible for child care licensing.

Source:

L. 2000:
Entire section added, p. 1372, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
Entire section amended, p. 970, § 5, effective June 2.